en: E622, Monopotassium glutamate, Potassium glutamate
xx: E622
bg: E622, Монокалиев глутамат, Калиев глутамат
ca: E622, Glutamat de monopotassi
cs: E622, Glutaman draselný, Glutamát draselný
da: E622, Monokaliumglutamat
de: E622, Monokaliumglutamat
el: E622, Οξινο γλουταμινικο καλιο, Γλουταμινικό κάλιο
es: E622, Glutamato de monopotasio, Glutamato de potasio, Glutamato monopotásico, E 622
et: E622, Kaaliumvesinikglutamaat
fi: E622, Monokaliumglutamaatti, Monokaliumglutamaattia
fr: E622, Glutamate monopotassique, Glutamate de potassium, 19473-49-5
hu: E622, Monokálium-glutamát, Kálium-glutamát
it: E622, Glutammato di monopotassio, Glutammato di potassio
lt: E622, Monokalio glutamatas, Kalio glutamatas
lv: E622, Monokālija glutamāts, Kālija glutamāts
mt: E622, Glutamat monopotassiku, Glutamat tal-potassju
nl: E622, Monokaliumglutamaat, Kaliumglutamaat
pl: E622, Glutaminian monopotasowy, Glutaminian potasu
pt: E622, Glutamato monopotássico, Glutamato de potássio
ro: E622, Glutamat monopotasic, Glutamat de potasiu
sk: E622, Glutaman draselný, Glutaman draselný
sl: E622, Monokalijev glutamat, kalijev glutamat
sv: E622, Monokaliumglutamat

en: E623, Calcium diglutamate
xx: E623
ar: E623, جلوتامات الكالسيوم
az: E623, Kalsium diqlutamat
bg: E623, Калциев диглутамат
ca: E623, Diglutamat de calci
cs: E623, Glutaman vápenatý
da: E623, Calciumdiglutamat
de: E623, Calciumdiglutamat
el: E623, Οξινο γλουταμινικο ασβεστιο
es: E623, Diglutamato de calcio
et: E623, Kaltsiumdiglutamaat
fa: E623, کلسیم دی گلوتامات
fi: E623, Kalsiumdiglutamaatti, Kalsiumdiglutamaattia
fr: E623, Diglutamate de calcium
hu: E623, Kalcium-diglutamát
it: E623, Diglutammato di calcio
ja: E623, グルタミン酸カルシウム
ko: E623, 글루탐산 칼슘
lt: E623, Kalcio diglutamatas
lv: E623, Kalcija diglutamāts
mk: E623, Калциум диглутамат
mt: E623, Diglutamat tal-kalċju
nl: E623, Calciumdiglutamaat
pl: E623, Diglutaminian wapnia
pt: E623, Diglutamato de cálcio
ro: E623, Diglutamat de calciu
ru: E623, Глутамат кальция
sk: E623, Glutaman vápenatý
sl: E623, Kalcijev diglutamat
sq: E623, Kalcium diglutamat
sr: E623, Калцијум диглутамат
sv: E623, Kalciumdiglutamat
th: E623, แคลเซียมไดกลูตาเมต
tr: E623, Kalsiyum diglutamat
uk: E623, Кальцію диглутамат
vi: E623, Canxi glutamat
zh: E623, 谷氨酸钙

en: E624, Monoammonium glutamate
xx: E624
bg: E624, Моноамониев глутамат
ca: E624, Glutamat de monoamoni
cs: E624, Glutaman amonný
da: E624, Monoammoniumglutamat
de: E624, Monoammoniumglutamat
el: E624, Οξινο γλουταμινικο αμμωνιο
es: E624, Glutamato de monoamonio, Glutamato de amonio, E 624
et: E624, Ammooniumvesinikglutamaat
fi: E624, Monoammoniumglutamaatti, Monoammoniumglutamaattia
fr: E624, Glutamate d'ammonium, Glutamate monoammonique
hu: E624, Monoammónium-glutamát
it: E624, Glutammato di monoammonio
lt: E624, Monoamonio glutamatas
lv: E624, Monoamonija glutamāts
mt: E624, Glutamat monoammoniku
nl: E624, Monoammoniumglutamaat
pl: E624, Glutaminian monoamonowy
pt: E624, Glutamato monoamónico
ro: E624, Glutamat monoamonic
sk: E624, Glutaman amónny
sl: E624, Monoamonijev glutamat
sv: E624, Monoammoniumglutamat

en: E625, Magnesium diglutamate
xx: E625
bg: E625, Магнезиев диглутамат
ca: E625, Diglutamat de magnesi
cs: E625, Glutaman hořečnatý
da: E625, Magnesiumdiglutamat
de: E625, Magnesiumdiglutamat
el: E625, Οξινο γλουταμινικο μαγνησιο
es: E625, Diglutamato de magnesio
et: E625, Magnesium diglutamate
fi: E625, Magnesiumdiglutamaatti, Magnesiumdiglutamaattia
fr: E625, Diglutamate de magnésium
hu: E625, Magnézium-diglutamát
it: E625, Diglutammato di magnesio
lt: E625, Magnio diglutamatas
lv: E625, Magnija diglutamāts
mt: E625, Diglutamat tal-manjeżju
nl: E625, Magnesiumdiglutamaat
pl: E625, Diglutaminian magnezu
pt: E625, Diglutamato de magnésio
ro: E625, Diglutamat de magneziu
sk: E625, Glutaman horečnatý
sl: E625, Magnezijev diglutamat
sv: E625, Magnesiumdiglutamat

en: E626, Guanylic acid, guanosine monophosphate
xx: E626
bg: E626, Гуанилова киселина
ca: E626, Àcid guanílic, acid guanilic
cs: E626, Guanylic acid
da: E626, Guanylsyre, Guanosinmonofosfat
de: E626, Guanylsäure, Guanosinmonophosphat
el: E626, Γουανιλικο οξυ
es: E626, Ácido guanílico, Guanosin monofosfato, Monofosfato de guanosina
et: E626, Guanüülhape
fi: E626, Guanyylihappo, Guanosiinimonofosfaatti, Guanyylihappoa, Guanosiinimonofosfaattia
fr: E626, Acide guanylique, Guanosine monophosphate
hu: E626, Guanilsav, Guanozin-monofoszfát
it: E626, Acido guanilico, Guanosina monofosfato, Guanosinmonofosfato, Acido guanidilico, Acido 5'-guanidilico
lt: E626, Guanilo rūgštis
lv: E626, Guanilskābe
mt: E626, Aċidu gwaniliku
nl: E626, Guanylzuur, guanosinemonofosfaat
pl: E626, Kwas guanylowy, guanozyno-5′-monofosforan, guanozynomonofosforan
pt: E626, Ácido guanílico, Guanosina monofosfato
ro: E626, Acid guanilic
sk: E626, Guanylic acid
sl: E626, Gvanilna kislina
sv: E626, Guanylsyra, E 626

en: E627, Disodium guanylate, Sodium guanylate
xx: E627
ar: E627, غوانيلات ثنائية الصوديوم
bg: E627, Динатриев гуанилат, Натриев гуанилат
ca: E627, Guanilat de disodi
cs: E627, Guanylan sodný, Guanylát sodný
da: E627, Dinatriumguanylat, Natriumguanylat
de: E627, Dinatriumguanylat, Natriumguanylat
el: E627, Γουανιλικο νατριο, Γουανιλικό νάτριο
eo: E627, Dunatria guanilato
es: E627, Guanilato disódico, Guanilato de sodio, Guanilato sódico, gualinato disódico
et: E627, Naatriumguanülaat
fa: E627, دی‌سدیم گوانیلات
fi: E627, Dinatriumguanylaatti, Natriumguanylaatti, Dinatriumguanylaattia, Natriumguanylaattia
fr: E627, Guanylate disodique, guanylate de sodium, Guanylate 5'-disodique, C10H12N5Na2O8P, 5550-12-9
hr: E627, dinatrijev guanilat, dinatrijev gvanilat
hu: E627, Dinátrium-guanilát, Nátrium-guanilát
id: E627, Dinatrium guanilat
it: E627, Guanilato bisodico, Guanilato sodico
lt: E627, Dinatrio guanilatas, Natrio guanilatas
lv: E627, Dinātrija guanilāts, Nātrija guanilāts
mt: E627, Gwanilat disodiku, Gwanilat tas-sodju
nl: E627, Natriumguanylaat, Natriumguanylaat
pl: E627, Guanylan disodowy, Guanylan sodu, guanozyno-5′-monofosforan disodu
pt: E627, Guanilato dissódico, Guanilato de sódio
ro: E627, Guanilat disodic, Guanilat de sodiu
ru: E627, e627, Двунатриевый гуанилат
sh: E627, Dinatrijum guanilat
sk: E627, Guanylan disodný, Guanylan sodný
sl: E627, Dinatrijev gvanilat, natrijev gvanilat
sr: E627, Dinatrijum guanilat
sv: E627, Dinatriumguanylat, Natriumguanylat
vi: E627, Dinatri guanylat

en: E628, Dipotassium guanylate, Potassium guanylate
xx: E628
bg: E628, Дикалиев гуанилат, Калиев гуанилат
ca: E628, Guanilat de dipotassi
cs: E628, Guanylan draselný, Guanylát draselný, guanylan didraselný
da: E628, Dikaliumguanylat, Kaliumguanylat
de: E628, Dikaliumguanylat, Kaliumguanylat
el: E628, Γουανιλικο καλιο, Γουανιλικό κάλιο
es: E628, Guanilato dipotásico, Guanilato de potasio
et: E628, Kaaliumguanülaat
fi: E628, Dikaliumguanylaatti, Kaliumguanylaatti, Dikaliumguanylaattia, Kaliumguanylaattia
fr: E628, Guanylate dipotassique, Guanylate de potassium
hu: E628, Dikálium-guanilát, Kálium-guanilát
it: E628, Guanilato dipotassico
lt: E628, Dikalio guanilatas, Kalio guanilatas
lv: E628, Dikālija guanilāts, Kālija guanilāts
mt: E628, Gwanilat dipotassiku, Gwanilat tal-potassju
nl: E628, Kaliumguanylaat, Dikaliumguanylaat
pl: E628, Guanylan dipotasowy, Guanylan potasu
pt: E628, Guanilato dipotássico, Guanilato de potássio
ro: E628, Guanilat dipotasic, Guanilat de potasiu
sk: E628, Guanylan dvojdraselný, Guanylan draselný
sl: E628, Dikalijev gvanilat, kalijev gvanilat
sv: E628, Dikaliumguanylat, Kaliumguanylat

en: E629, Calcium guanylate
xx: E629
bg: E629, Калциев гуанилат
ca: E629, Guanilat de calci
cs: E629, Guanylan vápenatý, Guanylát vápenatý
da: E629, Calciumguanylat
de: E629, Calciumguanylat
el: E629, Γουανιλικο ασβεστιο
es: E629, Guanilato cálcico, Guanilato de calcio
et: E629, Kaltsiumguanülaat
fi: E629, Kalsiumguanylaatti, Kalsiumguanylaattia
fr: E629, Guanylate de calcium
hu: E629, Kalcium-guanilát
it: E629, Guanilato di calcio
lt: E629, Kalcio guanilatas
lv: E629, Kalcija guanilāts
mt: E629, Gwanilat tal-kalċju
nl: E629, Calciumguanylaat
pl: E629, Guanylan wapnia
pt: E629, Guanilato de cálcio
ro: E629, Guanilat de calciu
sk: E629, Guanylan vápenatý
sl: E629, Kalcijev gvanilat
sv: E629, Kalciumguanylat

en: E630, Inosinic acid
xx: E630
bg: E630, Инозинова киселина
ca: E630, Àcid inosínic
cs: E630, Inosinová kyselina
da: E630, Inosinsyre
de: E630, Inosinsäure
el: E630, Ινοσινικο οξυ
es: E630
et: E630, Inosiinhape
fi: E630, Inosiinihappo, Inosiinihappoa, Inosiinimonofosfaattia
fr: E630, Acide inosinique
hu: E630, Inozinsav
it: E630, Acido inosinico
lt: E630, Inozino rūgštis
lv: E630, Inozīnskābe
mt: E630, Aċidu inosiniku
nl: E630, Inosinezuur
pl: E630, Kwas inozynowy
pt: E630, Ácido inosínico
ro: E630, Acid inozinic
sk: E630, Kyselina inozínová
sl: E630, Inozinska kislina
sv: E630, Inosinsyra

en: E631, Disodium inosinate, Sodium inosinate
xx: E631
ar: E631, إينوسينات ثنائية الصوديوم
bg: E631, Динатриев инозинат, Натриев инозинат
ca: E631, Inosinat de disodi, Inosinat de sodi
cs: E631, Inosinan sodný, Inosinan disodný, inosinát disodný
da: E631, Dinatriuminosinat, Natriuminosinat
de: E631, Dinatriuminosinat, Natriuminosinat
el: E631, Ινοσινικο νατριο, Ινοσινικό νάτριο
eo: E631, Dunatria inozinato
es: E631, Inosinato disódico, Inosinato de sodio, Inosinato sódico
et: E631, Naatriuminosinaat
fa: E631, دی‌سدیم اینوزینات
fi: E631, Dinatriuminosinaatti, Natriuminosinaatti, Dinatriuminosinaattia, Natriuminosinaattia
fr: E631, Inosinate disodique, inosinate de sodium, inosinate 5'-disodique, C10H11N4Na2O8P
hr: E631, dinatrijev inozinat
hu: E631, Dinátrium-inozinát, Nátrium-inozinát
id: E631, Dinatrium inosinat
it: E631, Inosinato disodico, Inosinato di sodio
lt: E631, Dinatrio inozinatas, Natrio inozinatas
lv: E631, Dinātrija inozināts, Nātrija inozināts
mt: E631, Inosinat disodiku, Inosinat tas-sodju
nl: E631, Dinatriuminosinaat, Natriuminosinaat
pl: E631, Inozynian disodowy, Inozynian sodu
pt: E631, Inosinato dissódico, Inosinato de sódio
ro: E631, Inozinat disodic, Inozinat de sodiu
ru: E631, Инозинат натрия, 5-инозинат-натрия 2-замещенный
sh: E631, Dinatrijum inozinat
sk: E631, Inozínan disodný, Inozínan sodný
sl: E631, Dinatrijev inozinat, natrijev inozinat
sr: E631, dinatrijum-inozitat
sv: E631, E631 dinatriuminosinat, Dinatriuminosinat, Natriuminosinat
tr: E631, disodyum inosinat
vi: E631, Natri-II inosinat

en: E632, Dipotassium inosinate, Potassium inosinate
xx: E632
bg: E632, Дикалиев инозинат, Калиев инозинат
ca: E632, Inosinat de dipotassi
cs: E632, Inosinan draselný, Inosinát didraselný
da: E632, Dikaliuminosinat, Kaliuminosinat
de: E632, Dikaliuminosinat, Kaliuminosinat
el: E632, Ινοσινικο καλιο, Ινοσινικό κάλιο
es: E632, Inosinato dipotásico, Inosinato de potasio
et: E632, Dikaaliuminosinaat
fi: E632, Dikaliuminosinaatti, Kaliuminosinaatti, Dikaliuminosinaattia, Kaliuminosinaattia
fr: E632, Inosinate dipotassique, Inosinate de potassium, inosinate 5'-dipotassique
hu: E632, Dikálium-inozinát, Kálium-inozinát
it: E632, Inosinato dipotassico, Inosinato di potassio
lt: E632, Dikalio inozinatas, Kalio inozinatas
lv: E632, Dikālija inozināts, Kālija inozināts
mt: E632, Inosinat dipotassiku, Inosinat tal-potassju
nl: E632, Dikaliuminosinaat, Kaliuminosinaat
pl: E632, Inozynian dipotasowy, Inozynian potasu
pt: E632, Inosinato dipotássico, Inosinato de potássio
ro: E632, Inozitat dipotasic, Inozinat de potasiu
sk: E632, Inozínan didraselný
sl: E632, Dikalijev inozinat, kalijev inozinat
sv: E632, Dikaliuminosinat, Kaliuminosinat

en: E633, Calcium inosinate
xx: E633
bg: E633, Калциев инозинат
ca: E633, Inosinat de calci
cs: E633, Inosinan vápenatý
da: E633, Calciuminosinat
de: E633, Calciuminosinat
el: E633, Ινοσινικο ασβεστιο
es: E633, Inosinato cálcico, Inosinato de calcio, E 633
et: E633, Kaltsiuminosinaat
fi: E633, Kalsiuminosinaatti, Kalsiuminosinaattia
fr: E633, Inosinate de calcium
hu: E633, Kalcium-inozinát
it: E633, Inosinato di calcio
lt: E633, Kalcio inozinatas
lv: E633, Kalcija inozināts
mt: E633, Inosinat tal-kalċju
nl: E633, Calciuminosinaat
pl: E633, Inozynian wapnia
pt: E633, Inosinato de cálcio
ro: E633, Inozinat de calciu
sk: E633, Inozínan vápenatý
sl: E633, Kalcijev inozinat
sv: E633, Kalciuminosinat

en: E634, Calcium 5'-ribonucleotide, Calcium 5'-ribonucleotides
xx: E634
bg: E634, Калциев 5'-рибонуклеотид
ca: E634, 5'-ribonucleòtid de calci
cs: E634, 5'-ribonukleotid vápenatý
da: E634, Calcium-5'-ribonucleotider
de: E634, Calcium-5'-ribonukleotid
el: E634, Αλατα με ασβεστιο των 5′-ριβονουκλεοτιδιων
es: E634, 5'-ribonucleótido de calcio
et: E634, Kaltsium-5'-ribonukleotiid
fi: E634, Kalsium-5'-ribonukleotidi, Kalsium-5'-ribonukleotidia
fr: E634, 5'-ribonucléotide calcique
hu: E634, Kalcium-5'-ribonukleotid
it: E634, 5'ribonucleotide di calcio
lt: E634, Kalcio 5′-ribonukleotidas
lv: E634, Kalcija 5'-ribonukleotīds
mt: E634, 5'-ribonukleotid tal-kalċju
nl: E634, Calcium-5'-ribonucleotiden
pl: E634, 5'-rybonukleotydy wapnia
pt: E634, 5'-ribonucleótidos de cálcio
ro: E634, 5'-ribonucleotidă de calciu
sk: E634, 5'-ribonukleotid vápenatý
sl: E634, Kalcijev 5'-ribonukleotid
sv: E634, Kalcium-5'-ribonukleotider

en: E635, Disodium 5'-ribonucleotide, Disodium 5'-ribonucleotides
xx: E635
bg: E635, Динатриев 5'-рибонуклеотид
ca: E635, 5'-ribonucleòtid de disodi
cs: E635, 5'-ribonukleotid sodný
da: E635, Dinatrium-5'-ribonucleotider
de: E635, Dinatrium-5'-ribonukleotid
el: E635, Αλατα με νατριο των 5'-ριβονουκλεοτιδιων
es: E635, 5'-ribonucleótido disódico
et: E635, Dinaatrium-5'-ribonukleotiid
fi: E635, Dinatrium-5'-ribonukleotidi, Dinatrium-5'-ribonukleotidia
fr: E635, 5'-ribonucléotide disodique, 5'-ribonucléotides disodiques, 5'-ribonucléotides de sodium
hr: E635, dinatrij 5'-ribonukleotidi, dinatrijevi 5'-ribonukleotidi
hu: E635, Dinátrium-5'-ribonukleotid, dinátrium-5-ribonukleotid, dinátrium-5-ribonukleotidok
it: E635, 5'ribonucleotide di disodio, disodio 5'-ribonucleotidi
ja: E635, 5'-リボヌクレオチド二ナトリウム, リボヌクレオチドナトリウム, リボヌクレオチドNa, リボヌクレオチドＮａ, リボヌクレオタイドナトリウム, リボヌクレオタイドNa, リボヌクレオタイドＮａ
lt: E635, Dinatrio 5'-ribonukleotidas
lv: E635, Dinātrija 5'-ribonukleotīds
mt: E635, 5'-ribonukleotid disodiku
nl: E635, Dinatrium-5'-ribonucleotiden
pl: E635, 5'-rybonukleotydy disodowe, disodowy 5'-rybonukleotyd, 5'-rybonukleotyd disodowy
pt: E635, 5'-ribonucleótidos dissódicos
ro: E635, 5'-ribonucleotidă disodică
ru: E635, e635, 5-рибонуклеотиды натрия 2-замещенные, 2-замещенный 5'-гуанилат натрия, 5 гуанилат натрия 2 замещенный
sk: E635, 5'-ribonukleotid disodný
sl: E635, Dinatrijev 5'-ribonukleotid
sv: E635, Dinatrium-5'-ribonukleotider, dinatrium-5'-ribonuk-leider

en: E636, Maltol
xx: E636
ar: E636, مالتول
az: E636, Maltol
bg: E636, Малтол
ca: E636, Maltol
cs: E636, Maltol
da: E636, Maltol
de: E636, Maltol
el: E636, Μαλτόλη
eo: E636, Maltolo
es: E636, Maltol
et: E636, Maltol
fa: E636, مالتول
fi: E636, Maltoli, Maltolia
fr: E636, Maltol
hu: E636, Maltol
it: E636, Maltolo
ja: E636, マルトール
ko: E636, 말톨
lt: E636, Maltolis
lv: E636, Maltols
mt: E636, Maltol
nl: E636, Maltol
pl: E636, Maltol
pt: E636, Maltol
ro: E636, Maltol
ru: E636, Мальтол
sk: E636, Maltol
sl: E636, Maltol
sv: E636, Maltol
th: E636, มอลทอล
tr: E636, Maltol
uk: E636, Мальтол
zh: E636, 麦芽酚

en: E637, Ethyl maltol
xx: E637
bg: E637, Етил малтол
cs: E637, Ethyl maltol
da: E637, Ethyl maltol
de: E637, Ethyl maltol
el: E637, Αιθυλο μαλτολη
es: E637, Etil maltol
et: E637, Etüül maltol
fi: E637, Etyylimaltoli, Etyylimaltolia
fr: E637, Éthyl maltol
hu: E637, Etil-maltol
it: E637, Etil maltolo
lt: E637, Etil maltolis
lv: E637, Etil maltols
mt: E637, Etil maltol
nl: E637, Ethyl maltol
pl: E637, Etylo-maltol
pt: E637, Etil maltol
ro: E637, Etil maltol
sk: E637, Ethyl maltol
sl: E637, Etil maltol
sv: E637, Etylmaltol

en: E638
xx: E638
ar: E638, أسبارتام الصوديوم
az: E638, Natrium aspartam
bg: E638, Натриев аспартам
ca: E638, Aspartam sòdic
cs: E638, Sodná sůl aspartamu
da: E638, Natrium aspartam
de: E638, Natriumaspartam
el: E638, Ασπαρτάμη νατρίου
eo: E638, Natria aspartamo
es: E638, Aspartamo de sodio
et: E638, Naatrium aspartaam
fi: E638, Natriumaspartaami, Natriumaspartaamia
fr: E638, Aspartame de sodium, Aspartame sodique
hu: E638, nátrium-aszpartám
it: E638, Aspartame di sodio
ja: E638, アスパルテームナトリウム
ko: E638, 아스파탐 나트륨
lt: E638, Natrio aspartamas
lv: E638, Nātrija aspartāms
mk: E638, Натриум аспартам
mt: E638, Aspartam tas-sodju
nl: E638, Natrium aspartaam
pl: E638, Aspartam sodu
pt: E638, Aspartamo de sódio
ro: E638, Aspartam de sodiu
ru: E638, Аспартам натрия
sk: E638, Aspartám sodný
sl: E638, Natrijev aspartam
sq: E638, Aspartam natriumi
sr: E638, Натријум аспартам
sv: E638, Natrium aspartam
th: E638, แอสปาร์แตมโซเดียม
tr: E638, Sodyum aspartam
uk: E638, Аспартам натрію
zh: E638, 天冬酰苯丙氨酸钠

en: E369, Alanin
xx: E639
ar: E639, ألانين
az: E639, Alanin
bg: E639, Аланин
ca: E639, Alanina
cs: E639, Alanin
da: E639, Alanin
de: E639, Alanin
el: E639, Αλανίνη
eo: E639, Alanino
es: E639, Alanina
et: E639, Alaniin
fa: E639, آلانین
fi: E639, Alaniini, Alaniinia
fr: E639, Alanine
hu: E639, Alanin
id: E639, Alanin
it: E639, Alanina
ja: E639, アラニン
ko: E639, 알라닌
lt: E639, Alaninas
lv: E639, Alanīns
mk: E639, Аланин
mt: E639, Alanina
nl: E639, Alanine
pl: E639, Alanina
pt: E639, Alanina
ro: E639, Alanină
ru: E639, Аланин
sk: E639, Alanín
sl: E639, Alanin
sr: E639, Аланин
sv: E639, Alanin
th: E639, อะลานีน
tr: E639, Alanin
uk: E639, Аланін
vi: E639, Alanin
zh: E639, 丙氨酸

en: E640, Glycine and its sodium salt
xx: E640
bg: E640, Глицин и натриевата му сол
ca: E640, Glicina i la seva sal de sodi
cs: E640, Glycin a jeho sodná sůl
da: E640, Glycin og natriumsaltet heraf
de: E640, Glycin und seine natriumsalze
el: E640, Γλυκινη και τα αλατα της με νατριο
es: E640, Glicina y su sal sódica
et: E640, Glütsiin ja glütsiini naatriumsool
fi: E640, Glysiini ja sen natriumsuola, Glysiiniä ja sen natriumsuolaa
fr: E640, Glycines et son sel de sodium
hu: E640, Glicin és nátriumsója
it: E640, Glicina e suo sale di sodio
lt: E640, Glicinas ir jo natrio druska
lv: E640, Glicīns un tā nātrija sāls
mt: E640, Gliċina u l-melħ tas-sodju tagħha
nl: E640, Glycine en natriumglycinaat
pl: E640, Glicyna i jej sól sodowa
pt: E640, Glicina e seu sal de sódio
ro: E640, Glicina și sarea sa de sodiu
sk: E640, Glycín a jeho sodná soľ
sl: E640, Glicin in njegova natrijeva sol
sv: E640, Glycin och natriumglycinat

en: E640(i), Glycine
xx: E640(i)
bg: E640(i), Глицин
ca: E640(i), Glicina
cs: E640(i), Glycin
da: E640(i), Glycin
de: E640(i), Glycin
el: E640(i), Γλυκινη
es: E640(i), Glicina
et: E640(i), Glütsiin
fi: E640(i), Glysiini, Glysiiniä
fr: E640(i), Glycine, Sucre de gélatine, acide aminoacétique, Acide aminoéthanoïque, acide 2-aminoéthanoïque, Glycocolle
hu: E640(i), Glicin
it: E640(i), Glicina
ja: E640(i), グリシン
lt: E640(i), Glicinas
lv: E640(i), Glicīns
mt: E640(i), Gliċina
nl: E640(i), Glycine
pl: E640(i), Glicyna
pt: E640(i), Glicina
ro: E640(i), Glicina
sk: E640(i), Glycín
sl: E640(i), Glicin
sv: E640(i), Glycin